District of Columbia statutes.
27-134

Prompt payments to subcontractors.

(a)

If a contract is between a contractor and subcontractor, or between a first-tier subcontractor and a second-tier subcontractor, the contractor or subcontractor shall pay undisputed amounts owed to its subcontractor within 7 days after receipt by the contractor or subcontractor of each payment received for its subcontractors’ work or materials.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, conditions of payment to the subcontractor on receipt by the contractor of payment from the owner may not abrogate or waive the right of the subcontractor to:

(1)

Claim a mechanics’ lien; or

(2)

Sue on a contractor’s bond.

(c)

Any provision of a contract made in violation of subsection (b) of this section is void as against the public policy of the District.

Nov. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 20-34, § 5, 60 DCR 11812

History

This section is referenced in § 27-135.

Section References